Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-213.01
Assignment of wages by head of family; violation; penalty.

Any person, firm, corporation, company, partnership, limited liability company, or business institution that violates section 36-213 shall (1) be liable to the party injured through such violation thereof for the amount of the wages withheld by any employer under such void assignment or notice of such void assignment, with all costs and expenses and a reasonable attorney's fee to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state, and (2) be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1939, c. 39, § 1, p. 195;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 36-214;

R.S.1943, § 36-213;

Laws 1949, c. 99, § 1(2), p. 274;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 171;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 199.